Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.520

High-performance public buildings—Compliance with requirements.

Public school districts must comply with high-performance public building[s] requirements under RCW 39.35D.010, 39.35D.020, 39.35D.040, 39.35D.060, and 28A.150.530.

[ 2005 c 12 s 9.]